Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.320

Seizure and forfeiture—Procedure.

(1) Any property subject to seizure and forfeiture under RCW 7.68.310 may be seized by the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the convicted person was convicted upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property.

(2) Proceedings for forfeiture are commenced by a seizure. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later, except that such real property seized may be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest.

(3) The prosecuting attorney who seized the property shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with *chapter 62A.9 RCW, or a certificate of title, shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title.

(4) If no person notifies the seizing prosecuting attorney in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the property within forty-five days for personal property or ninety days for real property, the property seized shall be deemed forfeited.

(5) If any person notifies the seizing prosecuting attorney in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the property within forty-five days for personal property or ninety days for real property, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The prosecuting attorney shall file the case into a court of competent jurisdiction. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. In cases involving personal property, the burden of producing evidence shall be by a preponderance and upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property. In cases involving real property, the burden of producing evidence shall be by a preponderance and upon the prosecuting attorney. The seizing prosecuting attorney shall promptly return the property to the claimant upon a determination by the prosecuting attorney or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the property.

(6) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the county auditor of the county in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court rules.

(7) A forfeiture action under this section may be brought at any time from the date of conviction until the expiration of the statutory maximum period of incarceration that could have been imposed for the crime involved.

(8) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if at the time the security interest was created, the secured party did not know that the property was subject to seizure and forfeiture.

[ 1993 c 288 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 62A.9 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2000 c 250 s 9A-901, effective July 1, 2001. For later enactment, see chapter 62A.9A RCW.